Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1327
Appellate court; trial; de novo on the record.

Trial in the appellate court shall be de novo on the record. Such case shall be advanced in the same manner as other causes which involve the public welfare and convenience and shall be set for an early hearing.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 27;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 126.